Oklahoma, session 2025, SB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes a credit for any individual for rent paid for his


or her primary residence. The credit allowed shall not exceed One


Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00) for tax year 2026, and the limit shall


be annually adjusted to reflect price inflation as measured by the


Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers and as published by the



Req. No. 236 Page 1


Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor for


subsequent tax years.


B. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer.


C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall provide a form to claim


the credit. The form shall require information from the individual


including his or her address, the name of the landlord, the required


monthly rent, and the total amount of rent paid in the tax year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-236 QD 1/19/2025 5:41:48 AM

























Req. No. 236 Page 2